District of Columbia statutes.
1-331.05

Selection of official residence.

Within 60 days of the submission of the Commission’s report to the Council and the Mayor, the Mayor shall propose the selection of a property to be used as the official residence and submit the proposed selection to the Council with a proposed resolution of approval. The proposed resolution shall specify, if applicable, the proposed methods of acquiring, renovating, and maintaining the property as the official residence. The Council or a committee of the Council shall hold a public hearing on the proposed resolution. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed resolution within 90 calendar days, excluding days of Council recess, the proposed resolution shall be deemed disapproved.

History

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-179, § 6, 47 DCR 6847

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-370.5.

Resolutions

Resolution 14-113, the “Approval of the Proposal from the Eugene B. Casey Foundation for an Official Residence of the Mayor Resolution of 2001”, was approved effective June 5, 2001.